District of Columbia statutes.
1-614.03

Repealed

Ratings.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1403, 25 DCR 5740
June 10, 1998, D.C. Law 12-154, § 101(q), 45 DCR 2464
1981 Ed., § 1-615.3.
1973 Ed., § 1-344.3.
Applicability of § 101(q) of D.C. Law 12-124: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 1-614.01.